Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB52.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Health Insurance Protection Against Limitations Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commissioner." The Insurance Commissioner of the Commonwealth."Department." The Insurance Department of the Commonwealth."Enrollee." A policyholder, subscriber, covered person or 1234567891011121314151617 other individual who is entitled to receive health care services under a health insurance policy."Group health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage on an annual basis to individuals who obtain health insurance coverage through a group."Health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage. The term does not include any of the following:(1) An accident only policy.(2) A credit only policy.(3) A long-term care or disability income policy.(4) A specified disease policy.(5) A Medicare supplement policy.(6) A fixed indemnity policy.(7) A dental only policy.(8) A vision only policy.(9) A workers' compensation policy.(10) An automobile medical payment policy.(11) A policy under which benefits are provided by the Federal Government to active or former military personnel and their dependents.(12) Any other similar policies providing for limited benefits."In-network provider." A provider who contracts with an insurer to provide health care services to an enrollee under a health insurance policy."Individual health insurance policy." A policy, subscriber 20250SB0052PN0096 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage on an annual basis to an individual other than in connection with a group."Insurer." An entity that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy that provides medical or health care coverage by a health care facility or licensed health care provider and that is governed under any of the following:(1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 and Article XXIV thereof.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations).(4) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations)."Out-of-network provider." A provider who does not contract with an insurer to provide health care services to an enrollee under a health insurance policy.Section 3. Limitation on annual and lifetime limits.(a) Limits.--Except as otherwise provided in this section, an insurer offering, issuing or renewing an individual or group health insurance policy may not establish, on either an annual or lifetime basis, a limit on the dollar value of any core benefit for an enrollee, whether provided by an in-network provider or out-of-network provider.(b) Core benefit.--For purposes of this section, a core benefit shall include:(1) A benefit for which no annual or lifetime per 20250SB0052PN0096 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enrollee limit was permitted to be included in an individual or small group policy first offered or issued in this Commonwealth in 2018.(2) A benefit hereafter specified by the department by regulation.(c) Benefits not subject to limitation.--The commissioner may promulgate regulations to exempt a benefit from the definition of core benefit under subsection (b) for the purposes of the limitation prohibitions under this section.(d) No coverage requirement.--This section shall not be construed to require coverage of any specific benefit.Section 4. Regulations.(a) Authority to promulgate.--The department may promulgate regulations as may be necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this act.(b) Temporary regulations.--(1) In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this act, the department may issue temporary regulations which shall expire no later than two years following publication of the temporary regulations in the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The temporary regulations shall be exempt from the following:(i) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(ii) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(iii) Section 204(b) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys 20250SB0052PN0096 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Act.(iv) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(2) The authority of the department to issue temporary regulations under this subsection shall expire two years from the effective date of this section. Regulations adopted after the two-year period shall be promulgated as provided by statute.Section 5. Enforcement.(a) Penalties.--Upon satisfactory evidence of the violation of any section of this act by an insurer or any other person, one or more of the following penalties may be imposed at the commissioner's discretion:(1) Suspension or revocation of the license of the offending insurer or other person.(2) Refusal, for a period not to exceed one year, to issue a new license to the offending insurer or other person.(3) A fine of not more than $5,000 for each violation of this act.(4) A fine of not more than $10,000 for each willful violation of this act.(b) Limitation.--(1) Fines imposed against an individual insurer under this act may not exceed $500,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(2) Fines imposed against any other person under this act may not exceed $100,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(c) Additional remedies.--The enforcement remedies imposed under this section are in addition to any other remedies or 20250SB0052PN0096 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 penalties that may be imposed under any other applicable law of this Commonwealth, including:(1) The act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act. Violations of this act shall be deemed to be an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.(2) The act of December 18, 1996 (P.L.1066, No.159), known as the Accident and Health Filing Reform Act.(3) The act of June 25, 1997 (P.L.295, No.29), known as the Pennsylvania Health Care Insurance Portability Act.(d) Administrative procedure.--The administrative provisions of this section shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies). A party against whom penalties are assessed in an administrative action may appeal to Commonwealth Court as provided in 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 6. Repeals.All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 7. Applicability.This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to any policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this section.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Insurance 20250SB0052PN0096 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department, this act shall apply to any policy issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this section.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0052PN0096 - 7 - 12345